Utah statutes.
53-9-110.   Application for registrant or apprentice license.

(1)  Every application for a registrant or apprentice license shall provide to the bureau:

(a)  the full name and address of the applicant;

(b) one passport-size color photograph of the applicant;

(c)  the name of the licensed agency for which the applicant will be an employee, apprentice, or contract registrant, if applicable;

(d)  authorization of the licensed agency or its designee to employ the apprentice or contract with the registrant, if applicable;

(e)  a verified statement of the applicant's experience and qualifications as provided in Section 53-9-108; and

(f)  the fee prescribed in Section 53-9-111.

(2)  An application for a registrant or apprentice license or renewal shall be accompanied by a surety bond in the amount of $10,000.

(3)  The surety bond required by this section shall:

(a)  protect against liability to third persons;

(b)  be continuous in form and run concurrently with the license period; and

(c)  provide for notice to the bureau in the event of cancellation of the surety bond.

(4) (a)  The bureau shall cancel a license when it receives notice from the insurer that the bond required in Subsection (2) has expired or been canceled.

(b)  The licensee shall be notified by the bureau when a license has been cancelled under this Subsection (4).

(c)  The license may be reinstated when the licensee:

(i)  files proof of a bond for the remainder of the license period; and

(ii)  pays the reinstatement fee prescribed in Section 53-9-111.



Amended by Chapter 432, 2011 General Session

